Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.250

Exercise of right of dissent—Rights and liabilities.

Any member or shareholder electing to exercise such right of dissent shall file with the corporation, prior to or at the meeting of members and shareholders at which such proposed corporate action is submitted to a vote, a written objection to such proposed corporate action. If such proposed corporate action be approved by the required vote and such member or shareholder shall not have voted in favor thereof, such member or shareholder may, within ten days after the date on which the vote was taken, make written demand on the corporation, or, in the case of a merger or consolidation, on the surviving or new corporation, domestic or foreign, for payment of the fair value of such member's membership or of such shareholder's shares, and, if such proposed corporate action is effected, such corporation shall pay to such member, upon surrender of his or her membership certificate, if any, or to such shareholder, upon surrender of the certificate or certificates representing such shares, the fair value thereof as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken approving the proposed corporate action, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of such corporate action. Any member or shareholder failing to make demand within the ten day period shall be bound by the terms of the proposed corporate action. Any member or shareholder making such demand shall thereafter be entitled only to payment as in this section provided and shall not be entitled to vote or to exercise any other rights of a member or shareholder.

No such demand shall be withdrawn unless the corporation shall consent thereto. The right of such member or shareholder to be paid the fair value of his or her membership or shares shall cease and his or her status as a member or shareholder shall be restored, without prejudice to any corporate proceedings which may have been taken during the interim, if:

(1) Such demand shall be withdrawn upon consent; or

(2) The proposed corporate action shall be abandoned or rescinded or the members or shareholders shall revoke the authority to effect such action; or

(3) In the case of a merger, on the date of the filing of the articles of merger the surviving corporation is the owner of all the outstanding shares of the other corporations, domestic and foreign, that are parties to the merger; or

(4) A court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that such member or shareholder is not entitled to the relief provided by this section.

Within ten days after such corporate action is effected, the corporation, or, in the case of a merger or consolidation, the surviving or new corporation, domestic or foreign, shall give written notice thereof to each dissenting member or shareholder who has made demand as herein provided, and shall make a written offer to each such member or shareholder to pay for such shares or membership at a specified price deemed by such corporation to be the fair value thereof. Except in cases where the fair value payable to dissenters is fixed in the articles of incorporation or pursuant to RCW 24.06.255, such notice and offer shall be accompanied by a balance sheet of the corporation in which the member holds his or her membership or the dissenting shareholder holds shares, as of the latest available date and not more than twelve months prior to the making of such offer, and a profit and loss statement of such corporation for the twelve months' period ended on the date of such balance sheet.

If the fair value payable to dissenting members or shareholders is fixed in the articles of incorporation or pursuant to RCW 24.06.255, or if within thirty days after the date on which such corporate action was effected the fair value of such shares or membership is agreed upon between any such dissenting member or shareholder and the corporation, payment therefor shall be made within ninety days after the date on which such corporate action was effected, upon surrender of the membership certificate, if any, or upon surrender of the certificate or certificates representing such shares. Upon payment of the agreed value the dissenting member or shareholder shall cease to have any interest in such membership or shares.

If the fair value payable to dissenting members or shareholders is not fixed in the articles of incorporation or pursuant to RCW 24.06.025, and within such period of thirty days a dissenting member or shareholder and the corporation do not so agree, then the dissenting member or shareholder shall be entitled to make written demand to the corporation, within sixty days after the date on which such corporate action was effected, requesting that the corporation petition for a determination of the fair value by a court. If such a demand is not timely made on the corporation, the right of such member or shareholder to demand to be paid the fair value of his or her membership or shares shall be forfeited. Within thirty days after receipt of such a written demand from any dissenting member or shareholder, the corporation shall, or at its election at any time within ninety days after the date on which such corporate action was effected may, file a petition in any court of competent jurisdiction in the county in this state where the registered office of the corporation is located praying that the fair value of such membership or shares be found and determined. If, in the case of a merger or consolidation, the surviving or new corporation is a foreign corporation without a registered office in this state, such petition shall be filed in the county where the registered office of the domestic corporation was last located. If the corporation shall fail to institute the proceeding as herein provided, any dissenting member or shareholder may do so in the name of the corporation. All dissenting members and shareholders, wherever residing, shall be made parties to the proceeding as an action against their memberships or shares quasi in rem. A copy of the petition shall be served on each dissenting member and shareholder who is a resident of this state and shall be served by registered or certified mail on each dissenting member or shareholder who is a nonresident. Service on nonresidents shall also be made by publication as provided by law. The jurisdiction of the court shall be plenary and exclusive. All members and shareholders who are parties to the proceeding shall be entitled to judgment against the corporation for the amount of the fair value of their shares. The court may, if it so elects, appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend a decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers shall have such power and authority as shall be specified in the order of their appointment or an amendment thereof. The judgment shall be payable only upon and concurrently with the surrender to the corporation of the membership certificate, if any, or of the certificate or certificates representing such shares. Upon payment of the judgment, the dissenting shareholder or member shall cease to have any interest in such shares or membership.

The judgment shall include an allowance for interest at such rate as the court may find to be fair and equitable in all the circumstances, from the date on which the vote was taken on the proposed corporate action to the date of payment.

The costs and expenses of any such proceeding shall be determined by the court and shall be assessed against the corporation, but all or any part of such costs and expenses may be apportioned and assessed as the court may deem equitable against any or all of the dissenting members and shareholders who are parties to the proceeding to whom the corporation shall have made an offer to pay for membership or shares if the court shall find that the action of such members or shareholders in failing to accept such offer was arbitrary or vexatious or not in good faith. Such expenses shall include reasonable compensation for and reasonable expenses of the appraisers, but shall exclude the fees and expenses of counsel for and experts employed by any party; but if the fair value of the memberships or shares as determined materially exceeds the amount which the corporation offered to pay therefor, or if no offer was made, the court in its discretion may award to any member or shareholder who is a party to the proceeding such sum as the court may determine to be reasonable compensation to any expert or experts employed by the member or shareholder in the proceeding.

Within twenty days after demanding payment for his or her shares or membership, each member and shareholder demanding payment shall submit the certificate or certificates representing his or her membership or shares to the corporation for notation thereon that such demand has been made. His or her failure to do so shall, at the option of the corporation, terminate his or her rights under this section unless a court of competent jurisdiction, for good and sufficient cause shown, shall otherwise direct. If membership or shares represented by a certificate on which notation has been so made shall be transferred, each new certificate issued therefor shall bear a similar notation, together with the name of the original dissenting holder of such membership or shares, and a transferee of such membership or shares shall acquire by such transfer no rights in the corporation other than those which the original dissenting member or shareholder had after making demand for payment of the fair value thereof.

[ 2001 c 271 s 14; 2000 c 167 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 50.]